Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0251.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "water affordability and
transparency act".
Sec. 3. As used in this act:
(a) "Charges" means the amounts that a provider bills to a
customer under specific circumstances that are not included in the
RMH S00877'25 (S-2) tw6f4b


provider's base rate, including, but not limited to, late fees,
connection fees, impact fees for new development, deposits for
opening new accounts, and any other fees, surcharges, or penalties.
(b) "Customer" means a person, entity, or end user that is
responsible for a water bill.
(c) "Customer class" means the provider's users identified
under categories that include, but are not limited to, residential,
commercial, industrial, irrigation, or wholesale.
(d) "Delinquency" means the measure by which a provider
determines a payment is late or overdue.
(e) "Delinquent account" means an account or water bill for
which there is a delinquency.
(f) "Department" means the department of health and human
services.
(g) "Local or statewide health emergency" means an emergency
as that term is defined in section 2 of the emergency management
act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.402.
(h) "Office" means the office of residential water
affordability created in section 7.
(i) "Provider" means a public or private community water
supply that provides retail water service in this state or performs
retail billing services for another community water supply.
(j) "Rates" means the fixed component, if any, and the
volumetric or other variable component, if any, of the cost of
provider's services that are applied to a customer class.
(k) "Residential customer" means an individual who receives,
or is eligible to receive, a provider's services at the
individual's primary residence.
(l) "Residential water affordability program" means the low-
RMH S00877'25 (S-2) tw6f4b


income water residential affordability program created under
section 14o of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.14o.
(m) "Restoration" means a reconnection of water service after
a shutoff.
(n) "Sewage" means sanitary sewage or, in the case of a
combined sewer system that is designed to convey both sanitary
sewage and stormwater, mixed sanitary sewage and stormwater.
(o) "Shutoff" means a disconnection of services due to
nonpayment.
(p) "Water bill" means a request from a provider to a customer
for payment for water service. Water bill includes a request for
payment of sewer, stormwater, or other related services if the
provider charges for those services.
(q) "Wholesale provider" means a provider that supplies water
service or the services of wastewater collection, wastewater
treatment, stormwater collection, or stormwater treatment to retail
providers for resale.
Sec. 5. (1) Each individual needs and should have access to
safe, clean, affordable, and accessible water for human
consumption, cooking, and sanitary purposes.
(2) This section does not expand any obligation of this state
to provide water or to require the expenditure of additional
resources to develop water infrastructure beyond the obligations
that may exist under law.
(3) The implementation of this section does not infringe on
the rights or responsibilities of any public water system in this
state.
Sec. 7. (1) The office of residential water affordability is
created within the department. The director shall appoint a deputy
RMH S00877'25 (S-2) tw6f4b


of the office.
(2) The office shall establish procedures for the office for
budgeting, expending money, and employing personnel in accordance
with the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to
18.1594.
(3) The office shall do both of the following:
(a) Track and maintain data on all of the following:
(i) All providers in this state, as identified by the
department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy.
(ii) The status of each provider's residential water
affordability program.
(iii) Information included in the report provided for in section
14t(16) of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.14t.
(b) Create and maintain a website accessible to the public
that contains the information included in the report provided for
in section 14t(16) of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL
400.14t.
Sec. 9. Not later than April 1, 2028, the department shall
develop a standardized provider report form that includes all of
the following:
(a) Whether a provider is a governmental or nongovernmental
entity.
(b) Whether a provider provides water, sewerage, or stormwater
services, or a combination of services, to retail or wholesale
providers.
(c) The name of the wholesale provider from which a retail
provider obtains service and the rate the retail provider pays for
the service, if applicable.
(d) A list of the provider's customer classes.
RMH S00877'25 (S-2) tw6f4b


(e) The number of customer connections to the provider's
system, listed by customer class.
(f) The provider's rates and charges in effect, including any
distinctions between customer classes and among customers in
different geographic areas within the provider's service area.
(g) All of the following information regarding shutoff
notices, shutoffs, and restorations during the previous calendar
year:
(i) The number of shutoff notices issued to residential
customers.
(ii) The number of residential customer shutoffs for a
delinquent account.
(iii) The aggregate dollar amount of arrears owed on all
delinquent accounts listed in subparagraph (ii).
(iv) The number of residential customer restorations.
(h) All of the following information regarding customer
accounts where a provider attempted to collect arrears owed on a
delinquent account using methods that did not include shutting off
service:
(i) The total number of customer accounts where the delinquency
resulted in litigation or action by an independent collection
agency, by customer class.
(ii) The aggregated dollar amount of arrears on the customer
accounts listed in subparagraph (i), by customer class.
(iii) The total number of customer accounts where a delinquency
resulted in a transfer of debt to the local taxing authority, by
customer class, and the aggregate dollar amount of arrears owed, by
customer class.
(iv) The provider's threshold amount for transferring balances
RMH S00877'25 (S-2) tw6f4b


to litigation, independent collection agents, or taxing
authorities.
(i) If the provider administers a low-income water
affordability program as provided for under section 14s of the
social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.14s, all of the following
information:
(i) A statement of the type of low-income water affordability
program.
(ii) The funding source for the low-income water affordability
program.
(iii) The date when a provider began administration of a low-
income water affordability program under section 14s of the social
welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.14s.
(iv) Eligibility criteria.
(v) The number of residential customers enrolled as of the
date of the report.
(vi) The number of first-time enrollees since the last
reporting period and the aggregate amount of arrears owed on the
delinquent accounts.
(vii) The average benefit amount provided to enrolled customers
per billing period.
(viii) The number of customers that defaulted while enrolled in
a low-income water affordability program. As used in this
subparagraph, "defaulted" means a failure to pay a water bill or
otherwise make a payment on arrears.
(ix) The aggregate amount of arrears resolved under a low-
income water affordability program.
(x) A link to or copy of the information available to
customers regarding the provider's low-income water affordability
RMH S00877'25 (S-2) tw6f4b


program.
(j) If the provider does not administer a low-income water
affordability program as provided for under section 14s of the
social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.14s, a statement of the
policy or practice the provider utilizes to refer customers to the
residential water affordability program.
(k) An identification of the authority or government body that
sets or approves a provider's rates, financial policies, or
decisions.
(l) Whether a provider holds a public hearing on a proposed
rate change.
(m) An itemized list of charges, fees, credits, and other cost
details on the provider's water bills and whether each item is
structured as a volumetric rate, uniform rate, flat rate, inclining
block rate, or declining block rate.
(n) The frequency of customer water bills, by customer class.
(o) Whether a provider has an emergency plan to restore water
service to all customers in shutoff status at the time of a
declaration of a local or statewide health emergency.
(p) The number of water and sewer main breaks reported to the
provider in the previous calendar year.
Sec. 11. (1) Not later than 15 months after the effective date
of this act, and by each April 1 thereafter, a provider shall
submit a report to the department using the standardized provider
report form created under section 9. The department shall make the
reports submitted under this subsection available on the
department's website.
(2) Not later than 20 months after the effective date of this
act and by each September 1 thereafter, the department shall
RMH S00877'25 (S-2) tw6f4b


compile a summary of the information submitted under subsection (1)
and make the summary available on the department's website.
(3) Not later than December 31, 2026, the department shall
provide training to providers on completing the standardized
provider report form created under section 9.
Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all
of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into
law:
(a) Senate Bill No. 248.
(b) Senate Bill No. 250.
Final Page
RMH S00877'25 (S-2) tw6f4b